North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-35 Publicly Traded Corporations
10-35-26.
Adoption of antitakeover provisions.

The articles or bylaws of a publicly traded corporation may not contain an antitakeover provision unless it has been approved by the required vote.

As used in this section:

Except as provided in subdivision b, “antitakeover provision” means a provision that:

Would block an acquisition by any person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any shares of the corporation or a change in control of the corporation absent compliance with the provision;

Restricts the price that may be paid by any person or group of persons in an acquisition of beneficial ownership of any shares of the corporation;

Restricts the terms of a transaction after the occurrence of a change in control of the corporation or limits the price that may be paid in such a transaction, when it may be conducted, or how it must be approved by the directors or shareholders;

Requires an approval of the directors or shareholders in addition to, or in a different manner from, whatever approvals are required under this chapter and chapter 10-19.1 for a transaction involving an acquisition by any person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any shares of the corporation or a change in control of the corporation;

Requires the approval of a nongovernmental third party for an acquisition by any person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any shares of the corporation or a transaction that would involve a change in control of the corporation;

Requires the corporation, directly or indirectly, to take an action that it would not have been required to take if it had not been the subject of an acquisition by any person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any of its shares or a transaction that would involve a change in control of the corporation;

Limits, directly or indirectly, the power of the corporation if it is the subject of an acquisition by any person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any of its shares or a transaction that would involve a change in control of the corporation to take an action that the corporation would have had the power to take, without that limit, if the acquisition of beneficial ownership or transaction had not occurred;

Changes or limits the voting rights of any shares of the corporation following a transaction involving an acquisition by any person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any shares of the corporation or a change in control of the corporation;

Would give any beneficial or record owner of shares of the corporation a direct right of action against a person or group of persons with respect to the acquisition by the person or group of persons of beneficial ownership of any shares in the corporation or control of the corporation; or

Is designed or intended to operate as, or that has the effect of, what is commonly referred to, either on July 1, 2007, or at any time thereafter, as a “business combination”, “control share acquisition”, “control share cash out”, “freeze out”, “fair price”, “disgorgement”, or other “antitakeover” provision.

“Antitakeover provision” does not include a provision in the terms of a class or series of shares:

If the shares are issuable upon the exercise of a poison pill, but only so long as the shares of the class or series are not issued by the corporation except pursuant to the exercise of a poison pill; or

Which serves to protect dividend, interest, sinking fund, conversion, exchange, or other rights of the shares, or to protect against the issuance of additional securities that would be on a parity with or superior to the shares.

“Control” has the same meaning as in the rules and regulations of the commission under the Exchange Act.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1.

10-35-27.
Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter and of chapter 10-19.1 must be liberally construed to protect and enhance the rights of shareholders in publicly traded corporations.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1.

10-35-28.
Annual report — Franchise fee.

Instead of filing an annual report under section 10-19.1-146, each publicly traded corporation shall file under this section, within the time provided in section 10-35-29, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the publicly traded corporation;

A statement that it is a publicly traded corporation;

The name of the publicly traded corporation’s registered agent and the address of the registered office of the publicly traded corporation;

The address of the principal executive office of the publicly traded corporation;

A brief statement of the character of the business, if any, in which the publicly traded corporation is actually engaged in this state; and

The names and respective business addresses of the executive officers and directors of the publicly traded corporation.

The annual report must be submitted on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The information provided must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. The annual report must be signed as provided in subsection 58 of section 10-19.1-01, the articles or the bylaws, or by a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of the directors. If the publicly traded corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, it must be signed on behalf of the publicly traded corporation by the receiver or trustee. The secretary of state may destroy all annual reports provided for in this section after they have been on file for six years.

Instead of the fees provided for annual report filings in section 10-19.1-147, the secretary of state shall collect a franchise fee with the annual report from every publicly traded corporation for each calendar year in an amount equal to sixty dollars for each ten thousand shares of authorized capital stock of the publicly traded corporation.

In the case of a publicly traded corporation that has not been a publicly traded corporation during an entire twelve-month calendar year, the amount of the publicly traded corporation franchise fee due, as provided in this section, shall be prorated on a monthly basis for the portion of the year during which the publicly traded corporation was a publicly traded corporation. For this purpose, any portion of a month shall be regarded as a whole month.

In no case shall the publicly traded corporation franchise fee imposed by this section be more than eighty thousand dollars or less than sixty dollars.

If a publicly traded corporation changes during a calendar year the number of shares of its authorized capital stock, the total annual publicly traded corporation franchise fee payable as provided in this section shall be arrived at by adding together the franchise fees calculated as set forth in this section as prorated for the several periods of the year during which each distinct authorized amount of shares of capital stock was in effect.

For the purpose of computing the franchise fee imposed by this section, the authorized capital stock of a publicly traded corporation shall be considered to be the total number of shares of all classes and series that the public corporation is authorized to issue, whether or not the number of shares that may be outstanding at any one time is a lesser number.

Except as provided in this subsection, the publicly traded corporation franchise fee shall be in addition to any other taxes or fees imposed by this state on the publicly traded corporation.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1; 2013, ch. 89, § 14; 2019, ch. 94, § 18, effective August 1, 2019.

10-35-29.
Filing of annual report and payment of publicly traded corporation franchise fee.

Except for the first annual report and publicly traded corporation franchise fee, the annual report and publicly traded corporation franchise fee must be delivered to the secretary of state before December second of each year. The first annual report and payment of the publicly traded corporation franchise fee must be delivered before the date provided in the year following the calendar year in which the statement described in subdivision b of subsection 6 of section 10-35-02 takes effect.

The secretary of state must file the annual report if the annual report conforms to the requirements of section 10-35-28 and the publicly traded corporation franchise fee has been paid.

If the annual report does not conform or adequate payment has not been made, the secretary of state must notify the publicly traded corporation of any necessary corrections or payment.

If the annual report is corrected and filed with the payment before the date provided in subsection 1, or within thirty days after the publicly traded corporation was notified of corrections or payment by the secretary of state, then the penalties provided in section 10-35-31 for failure to file an annual report within the time provided do not apply.

The secretary of state may extend the annual report filing date provided in subsection 1 for a period not to exceed eleven months after the filing date provided in subsection 1 if a written application for an extension is delivered before the date provided in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1; 2019, ch. 92, § 11, effective August 1, 2019.

10-35-30.
Collection of publicly traded corporation franchise fee — Preferred debt.

The publicly traded corporation franchise fee shall be a debt due from the publicly traded corporation to the state for which an action at law may be maintained after the same shall have been in arrears for a period of one month. The publicly traded corporation franchise fee shall also be a preferred debt in case of insolvency.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1.

10-35-31.
Penalties — Administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of the annual report and payment of the publicly traded corporation franchise fee as follows:

Within ninety days after the date provided in subsection 1 of section 10-35-29, two hundred fifty dollars.

Ninety days after the date provided in subsection 1 of section 10-35-29, the publicly traded corporation becomes not in good standing. The secretary of state shall notify the publicly traded corporation that its certificate of incorporation is not in good standing and that it may be dissolved as provided in subsection 2.

The secretary of state shall mail the notice of impending dissolution to the last registered agent at the last registered office of record.

If the publicly traded corporation files its annual report after the notice is mailed, together with the publicly traded corporation franchise fee and a late filing penalty of one thousand dollars, then the secretary of state shall restore its certificate of incorporation to good standing.

A publicly traded corporation that fails to file its annual report or to pay the publicly traded corporation franchise fee due within one year after the date provided in subsection 1 of section 10-35-29 ceases to exist as a corporation and is considered involuntarily dissolved by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the dissolution of the certificate of incorporation of the publicly traded corporation on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the dissolved publicly traded corporation.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent at the last registered office of record.

A publicly traded corporation dissolved for failure to file an annual report or to pay a publicly traded corporation franchise fee due may be reinstated within one year following the dissolution by:

Filing a past-due annual report with the publicly traded corporation franchise fee due;

Paying a late filing penalty of one thousand dollars; and

Paying a reinstatement fee of one hundred thirty-five dollars.

Reinstatement under this subsection does not affect the rights or liabilities arising during the time from the dissolution to the reinstatement.

Fees paid to the secretary of state according to this chapter are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because it lacks information required by section 10-35-28 or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by section 10-35-28 or as required by this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1.

10-35-32.
Secretary of state — Powers — Enforcement — Penalty — Appeal.

The secretary of state has the power and authority reasonably necessary to efficiently administer this chapter and to perform the duties imposed thereby.

The secretary of state may propound to any publicly traded corporation that is subject to this chapter and to any officer, director, or employee thereof, any interrogatory reasonably necessary and proper to ascertain whether the publicly traded corporation has complied with all provisions of this chapter applicable to the publicly traded corporation.

The interrogatory must be answered within thirty days after mailing or within any additional time as may be fixed by the secretary of state. The answer to the interrogatory must be full and complete and must be made in writing and under oath.

If the interrogatory is directed:

To an individual, it must be answered by that individual; or

To a publicly traded corporation, it must be answered by the president, vice president, secretary, or assistant secretary of the publicly traded corporation.

The secretary of state is not required to file any record to which the interrogatory relates until the interrogatory has been answered, and not then if the answers disclose the record is not in conformity with this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for action the attorney general may deem appropriate, any interrogatory and answers thereto, which discloses a violation of this chapter.

Each officer, director, or employee of a publicly traded corporation who fails or refuses within the time provided by subdivision a to answer truthfully and fully an interrogatory propounded to that person by the secretary of state is guilty of an infraction.

An interrogatory propounded by the secretary of state and the answers are not open to public inspection. The secretary of state may not disclose any facts or information obtained from the interrogatory or answers except insofar as permitted by law or insofar as required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or other action by this state.

If the secretary of state rejects any record required by this chapter to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed, then the secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection.

Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the publicly traded corporation may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record by the secretary of state.

The matter must be tried de novo by the court. The court shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action the court determines proper.

If the secretary of state dissolves a publicly traded corporation pursuant to subsection 2 of section 10-35-31, then the publicly traded corporation may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of court a petition, including:

A copy of the publicly traded corporation’s articles of incorporation; and

A copy of the notice of dissolution given by the secretary of state.

The district court shall try the matter de novo. The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action the court determines proper.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a publicly traded corporation that has been dissolved as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-35-31, then together with any other actions the court deems proper, any such order which reverses the decision of the secretary of state shall require the publicly traded corporation to:

File all past-due annual reports;

Pay the publicly traded corporation franchise fees to the secretary of state for each annual report as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-35-28; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-35-31.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the district court under this section in review of any ruling or decision of the secretary of state are treated as other civil actions.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1.

10-35-33.
Funds received.

Twenty percent of the fees received by the secretary of state for filing records of a publicly traded corporation as provided for in section 10-19.1-147 or this chapter must be deposited in the secretary of state’s general services operating fund to pay the cost to administer this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 102, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 62.